District of Columbia statutes.
42-406

First recorded deed preferred.

When 2 or more deeds of the same property are made to bona fide purchasers for value without notice, the deed or deeds which are first recorded according to law shall be preferred.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 500

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-802.
1973 Ed., § 45-502.